Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-120.01
Telehealth, defined.

Telehealth means the use of medical information electronically exchanged from one site to another, whether synchronously or asynchronously, to aid a credential holder in the diagnosis or treatment of a patient. Telehealth includes services originating from a patient's home or any other location where such patient is located, asynchronous services involving the acquisition and storage of medical information at one site that is then forwarded to or retrieved by a credential holder at another site for medical evaluation, and telemonitoring.

Laws 2018, LB701, § 3.